Mississippi, session 2026, HB1790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-45-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-45-7.  (1)  Equipment not covered by this chapter includes, but is not limited to, the following: (a)  Material hoists within the scope of ANSI A10.5; (b)  Man lifts within the scope of ASME A90.1; (c)  Mobile scaffolds, towers and platforms within the scope of ANSI A92; (d)  Powered platforms and equipment for exterior and interior maintenance within the scope of ANSI A120.1; (e)  Conveyors and related equipment within the scope of ASME B20.1; (f)  Cranes, derricks, hoists, hooks, jacks and slings within the scope of ASME B30; (g)  Industrial trucks within the scope of ASME B56; (h)  Portable equipment, except for portable escalators that are covered by ASME A17.1/CSA B44 and ASME A17.7/CSA B44.7; (i)  Tiering or piling machines used to move materials to and from storage located and operating entirely within one (1) story; (j)  Equipment for feeding or positioning materials at machine tools, printing presses, or similar equipment; (k)  Kip or furnace hoists; (l)  Wharf ramps; (m)  Railroad car lifts or dumpers; and (n)  Line jacks, false cars, shafters, moving platforms and similar equipment used for installing an elevator by an elevator contractor licensed in this state. (2)  The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any conveyance that is located in a private residence, except that upon completion of installation, modification, or alteration of a private resident elevator, licensed elevator inspector shall conduct an acceptance inspection per the most recent adopted version of ASME A17.1/CSA B44, before the elevator is placed in service.  Upon the completion of the final acceptance inspection, the owner shall register the private residence elevator with the Mississippi Conveyance Safety Act Division of the Mississippi Insurance Department on a form furnished by the division, and the division shall maintain a database of registered elevators. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.